Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB646.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "medical product" means a product used to diagnose or
manage a disease, including a medical device, drug, or biologic.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a public or
government entity or any agency or division thereof shall not require an
individual to take, receive, or disclose whether the individual has taken or
received a medical product unless the manufacturer of the medical product is
liable for any death or serious injury caused by the medical product.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 10:08 AM Jacketed